Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1677YC (2) 91 ll/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.441, subsection 2, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (20), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (20) The construction, reconstruction, and improvement 3 of all waterways, and real and personal property, useful 4 for the protection or reclamation of property from floods 5 or high waters, and for the protection of property from the 6 effects of flood waters floodwaters , including reconnection 7 of floodplains, wetland and oxbow lake restoration, the 8 deepening, widening, alteration, change, diversion, or other 9 improvement of watercourses, the construction of levees, 10 embankments, structures, impounding reservoirs, pumping 11 stations or conduits, and the establishment, improvement, and 12 widening of streets, avenues, boulevards, and alleys across 13 and adjacent to the project, as well as the development and 14 beautification of the banks and other areas adjacent to flood 15 control improvements. 16